Wyoming statutes. Title 18 Counties
Article 5. County Commissioners
§ 18-3-510.
Claims against county to be itemized and verified; penalty.

No claim against the county shall be allowed by the board of county commissioners unless it is properly dated and itemized and the value of each item specifically described, and when no specified fees are allowed by law, the date that such services were rendered and the time actually and necessarily devoted to the performance of any service. Each claim shall be accompanied by an affidavit, stating that the claim is just and correct and that no part of the claim has been paid by the county or other person. The board of county commissioners may disallow any account, in whole or in part, when so rendered and verified, and may require further evidence of the truth and propriety of the claim. This section does not apply to claims under W.S.

1-39-101

through

1-39-120

.

The board of county commissioners shall be held responsible on their official bonds to the full amount of any claim allowed, to be recovered in an action of debt for the use of the county, should the evidence show that any part of any claim has been allowed by any board of county commissioners contrary to the provisions of this section.

History.

Laws 1879, ch. 32, §§ 1, 2; R.S. 1887, §§ 1805, 1806; R.S. 1899, §§ 1062, 1063; C.S. 1910, §§ 1170, 1171; C.S. 1920, §§ 1416, 1417; R.S. 1931, §§ 30-609, 30-610; C.S. 1945, §§ 27-810, 27-811; W.S. 1957, §§ 18-153, 18-154; Laws 1977, ch. 124, § 1; 1979, ch. 157, § 2; 2010, ch. 82, § 1; 2017 ch. 41, § 1, effective July 1, 2017.

The 2010 amendment,

substituted “1-39-121” for “1-39-119” in (a).

Laws 2010, ch. 82, § 6, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 9, 2010.

The 2017 amendment,

effective July 1, 2017, in the last sentence of (a), substituted “1-39-120” for “1-39-121.”

Editor's notes. —

Section 1, ch. 32, Laws 1879, repealed § 15, art. I, ch. 28, C.L. 1876, and inserted this section in lieu thereof.

Condition precedent to action. —

Presentation to town of verified claim is necessary before commencement of action thereon against the town. Town Council of Hudson v. Ladd, 37 Wyo. 419, 263 P. 703,

1928 Wyo. LEXIS 15

(Wyo. 1928).

Reasonable construction. —

Where petition of a doctor alleged that verified claim had been filed with the county clerk, but that copy was not attached for the reason that it had been lost or mislaid, reasonable construction of the petition showed that the account must have been presented for allowance in accordance with statute. Board of Comm'rs v. Denebrink, 15 Wyo. 342, 89 P. 7,

1907 Wyo. LEXIS 14

(Wyo. 1907).

Requirements of presentment. —

Where attorney for one having claim against a county sent written communication to the board, demanding “recovery back” of certain money stated to have been paid into the county treasury under duress by 3 persons named, who had assigned claims against the county to the claimant but where communication was not verified, nor alleged to whom money had been paid, or other circumstances relative to the claim, there was no presentment authorizing the commissioners to act on it. Houtz v. Board of Comm'rs, 11 Wyo. 152, 70 P. 840,

1902 Wyo. LEXIS 30

(Wyo. 1902).

Removal of commissioner. —

To justify the removal of county commissioner for payment of claim for unitemized claims, neglect should involve willful design or indicate habitual inattention to public business, since not every technical violation of statute or official duty will justify summary removal. State v. Scott, 35 Wyo. 108, 247 P. 699,

1926 Wyo. LEXIS 11

(Wyo. 1926).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Power of county or its officials to compromise claim, 15 ALR2d 1359.

Power to remit, release, or compromise tax claim, 28 ALR2d 1425.

Waiver of, or estoppel to assert, failure to give required notice of claim of injury to municipality, county, or other governmental agency or body, 65 ALR2d 1278.

Amount of damages stated in notice of claim against municipality or county as limiting amount of recovery, 24 ALR3d 965.

§ 18-3-511.
Presentation, auditing and payment of claims; issuance of tax-anticipation warrants; limitation and form of warrants; effect of acceptance.

All claims and demands against a county shall be presented for audit and allowance to the board of county commissioners before any action in court is maintainable. All claims when allowed shall be paid by a county warrant or order drawn by the board on the county treasurer upon the proper funds in the treasury for the amount of the claims. The warrant or order shall be signed by the permanent or temporary chairman of the board, attested by the county clerk under the seal of the county, and countersigned and registered by the county treasurer. The warrant or order shall specify the amount of the claim or service and be numbered and dated in the order in which it is issued. Such warrants and orders are payable on demand and shall be drawn and issued upon the county treasurer only when there are sufficient monies in the appropriate fund in the treasury to pay such warrants and orders.

Whenever there are no monies in the proper fund of the county treasury to meet the necessary expenses of the county, the board of county commissioners may authorize county warrants and orders to be drawn and issued in anticipation of the collection of taxes already levied. The aggregate amount of such warrants or orders may not exceed eighty percent (80%) of the total amount of taxes levied. The warrants and orders so drawn and issued shall show that they are payable solely from the fund on which they are drawn and the taxes levied to form the fund when collected. These warrants and orders do not increase the indebtedness of the county.

County warrants and orders may be in such form as the county commissioners provide and made payable to the order of the payee or bearer. The person or persons to whom the warrants and orders are allowed and delivered are held to have accepted the same in full payment and satisfaction of the claim for which it was issued. The warrants shall be paid only from the fund drawn upon, and the collected taxes paid into the county treasury to create, constitute and form the fund. The taxes provided by law shall be paid into the fund until all warrants drawn are fully paid including principal and interest.

History.

Laws 1893, ch. 33, § 1; R.S. 1899, § 1216; C.S. 1910, § 1128; C.S. 1920, § 1362; R.S. 1931, § 30-102; C.S. 1945, § 27-812; W.S. 1957, § 18-155; Laws 1977, ch. 124, § 1.

Editor's notes. —

As amended by § 1, ch. 33, Laws 1893, this section contained a proviso clause, reading as follows: “Provided, that the provisions of this law shall in nowise affect the lawful warrants and orders of any county, which were issued prior to the passage of this law, and are outstanding and unpaid, but such warrants and the debt thereof, unless ratified as independent debts, within the limitations of the constitution, as provided by law, and redeemed under the funding statutes shall be paid, both principal and interest, in the order of their registry, from the fund on which they were drawn.”

“Claims and demands.” —

The phrase “claims and demands” embraces all claims and demands based on money demand. Houtz v. Board of Comm'rs, 11 Wyo. 152, 70 P. 840,

1902 Wyo. LEXIS 30

(Wyo. 1902).

Acceptors of warrants limited to claim against fund againstwhich issued and not against general credit. —

The intent of this section is that when warrants or certificates of indebtedness are issued against a limited fund and the fund is exhausted, no further claim against the general credit of the county shall exist on the part of those who have accepted such warrants. Ballangee v. Board of County Comm'rs, 66 Wyo. 390, 212 P.2d 71,

1949 Wyo. LEXIS 18

(Wyo. 1949).

Debt limitation. —

The limitation of indebtedness imposed by art. 16, §§ 3, 4, Wyo. Const., providing that no county shall create any indebtedness exceeding 2 percent of the assessed value of property, and that no debt in excess of taxes for the current year shall be created by any county except by vote of the people, applies to all debts of the county, whether compulsory obligations imposed by law for salaries or bounties or voluntary obligations entered into for any purpose. Grand I. & N. W. R.R. v. Baker, 6 Wyo. 369, 45 P. 494,

1896 Wyo. LEXIS 21

(Wyo. 1896).

Proof of presentation and rejection. —

A court was without jurisdiction to enter judgment against an executrix in the absence of pleading and proof that the claim had been presented and rejected. Delfelder v. Farmers' State Bank, 38 Wyo. 481, 269 P. 418,

1928 Wyo. LEXIS 72

(Wyo.), reh'g denied, 38 Wyo. 481, 269 P. 418,

1928 Wyo. LEXIS 73

(Wyo. 1928).

Presentation to town. —

Presentation to town of verified claim is necessary before commencement of action thereon against the town. Town Council of Hudson v. Ladd, 37 Wyo. 419, 263 P. 703,

1928 Wyo. LEXIS 15

(Wyo. 1928).

Presumption of compliance. —

A petition for mandamus to compel chairman of board of commissioners to sign a warrant, which states that the board allowed petitioner's claim and ordered it paid, and the clerk drew warrant therefor, is not demurrable for failure to state that there were funds in the treasury to pay the same and that an itemized statement was filed, since on demurrer it will be presumed that the officers did not violate the law. Appel v. State, 9 Wyo. 187, 61 P. 1015,

1900 Wyo. LEXIS 13

(Wyo. 1900).

Reasonable construction of petition as in accordance with statute.—

Where in action against county, petition alleged that plaintiff, a practicing physician, in order to save the life of a person who was injured, amputated his arm, gave proper surgical and medical attention, and that such medical and surgical attention was reasonably worth a certain sum; that plaintiff filed with the county clerk a verified claim, but that a copy of the claim was not attached to the complaint for the reason that it had been mislaid, or lost, a reasonable construction of petition showed that account must have been presented for allowance in accordance with the statute. Board of Comm'rs v. Denebrink, 15 Wyo. 342, 89 P. 7,

1907 Wyo. LEXIS 14

(Wyo. 1907).

Disallowance of claims. —

Where county commissioners contracted with attorney to defend county in court actions, allowed claim for retainer and issued certificates of indebtedness, which were registered and assigned by payees for value, but later passed resolution to effect that attorneys had not rendered service, cancelled certificates and ordered treasurer not to pay them, allowance of claim and issuance of certificates did not preclude county from contesting claim, as certificates are merely orders on the treasurer to pay when funds available, and may be revoked and payment stopped if later a defense develops which justifies rescission of contract. Treasurer in mandamus action may plead the resolution and order of commissioners as his defense. State ex rel. Robertson Inv. Co. v. Patterson, 47 Wyo. 416, 38 P.2d 617,

1934 Wyo. LEXIS 36

(Wyo. 1934).

Creation of new county. —

The provisions of this section for audit and allowance does not apply to the adjustment of county debts and property between a parent county and one created out of part of its territory. In re Fremont County, 8 Wyo. 1, 54 P. 1073,

1898 Wyo. LEXIS 21

(Wyo. 1898).

Cited

in

Board of County Comm'rs v. Rollins & Sons, 9 Wyo. 281, 62 P. 351,

1900 Wyo. LEXIS 19

(1900); Board of County Comm'rs v. Laramie County Sch. Dist. No. One, 884 P.2d 946,

1994 Wyo. LEXIS 144

(Wyo. 1994).

§ 18-3-512.
[Repealed.]

Repealed by Laws 2011, ch. 129, § 207.

Editor's Notes. —

This section, which derived from Laws 1893, ch. 33, § 2; R.S. 1899, § 1217; C.S. 1910, § 1129; C.S. 1920, § 1363; R.S. 1931, § 30-103; C.S. 1945, § 27-813; W.S. 1957, § 18-156; Laws 1977, ch. 124, § 1, related to separate accounts to be kept for taxes levied and collected.

Laws 2011, ch. 129, § 601, makes the act effective July 1, 2011.

Repealing clauses. —

Section 3, ch. 33, Laws 1893, repealed all laws and parts of laws in conflict therewith.

Cited

in

In re Fremont County, 8 Wyo. 1, 54 P. 1073,

1898 Wyo. LEXIS 21

(1898); Board of County Comm'rs v. Rollins & Sons, 9 Wyo. 281, 62 P. 351,

1900 Wyo. LEXIS 19

(1900).

§ 18-3-513.
Appeal on disallowance of claim.

When any claim against a county is disallowed by the board of commissioners, the claimant may appeal the decision of the board to the district court for the county by serving a written notice of appeal on the clerk and chairman of the board within ten (10) days after the decision, and by executing a bond to the county with sufficient security, approved by the clerk of the board, conditioned for the faithful prosecution of the appeal and payment of all costs adjudged against the appellant.

When the appeal is perfected, the clerk of the board shall immediately give notice to the county attorney. The clerk shall make a brief return of the proceedings before the board with the decision properly certified and file the same together with the bond and all papers in the case in his possession with the clerk of the district court. The appeal shall be entered, tried and determined and costs awarded the same as appeals from circuit courts. This section does not apply to claims under W.S.

1-39-101

through

1-39-120

.

History.

C.L. 1876, ch. 28, art. I, §§ 17, 18; R.S. 1887, §§ 1808, 1809; R.S. 1899, §§ 1064, 1065; C.S. 1910, §§ 1172, 1173; C.S. 1920, §§ 1418, 1419; R.S. 1931, §§ 30-611, 30-612; C.S. 1945, §§ 27-814, 27-815; W.S. 1957, §§ 18-157, 18-158; Laws 1977, ch. 124, § 1; 1979, ch. 157, § 2; 2004, ch. 42, § 1; 2010, ch. 82, § 1; 2017 ch. 41, § 1, effective July 1, 2017.

The 2004 amendment,

in (b), substituted “circuit courts” for “justice courts.”

Laws 2004, ch. 42, § 3, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 3, 2004.

The 2010 amendment,

substituted “1-39-121” for “1-39-119” in (b).

Laws 2010, ch. 82, § 6, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 9, 2010.

The 2017 amendment,

effective July 1, 2017, in the last sentence of (b), substituted “1-39-120” for “1-39-121.”

Revocation of allowance of claim. —

Though county commissioners allowed claim and issued certificates of indebtedness, they may thereafter revoke allowance of claim and stop payment if they believe there is a defense to the claim. State ex rel. Robertson Inv. Co. v. Patterson, 47 Wyo. 416, 38 P.2d 617,

1934 Wyo. LEXIS 36

(Wyo. 1934).

Direct action in lieu of appeal. —

A claimant whose voucher to a city has been rejected may institute direct action for the recovery of the amount claimed, rather than proceeding under statute by appeal to the district court. Fanning v. City of Laramie, 402 P.2d 460,

1965 Wyo. LEXIS 144

(Wyo. 1965), commented on in 1 Land & Water L. Rev. 532 (1966).

Quoted

in

Atlantic Richfield Co. v. Board of County Comm'rs, 569 P.2d 1267,

1977 Wyo. LEXIS 318

(Wyo. 1977).

§ 18-3-514.
County officers to be provided with stationery and supplies.

Each board of county commissioners at the expense of the county shall annually furnish to the county assessor and county treasurer suitable blank books and forms necessary for their respective offices prepared in accordance with law. The board shall also provide suitable books and stationery for each of the county officers together with appropriate cases, equipment and furniture for the safe and convenient keeping of all the officer’s books, documents and papers and shall provide official seals when required by law.

History.

C.L. 1876, ch. 28, art. I, § 19; R.S. 1887, § 1810; R.S. 1899, § 1066; C.S. 1910, § 1174; C.S. 1920, § 1420; R.S. 1931, § 30-613; C.S. 1945, § 27-816; W.S. 1957, § 18-159; Laws 1977, ch. 124, § 1; 2019 ch. 3, § 1, effective July 1, 2019.

Cross references. —

As to public printing and supplies, with reference to the state generally, see §

16-6-301

.

The 2019 amendment,

effective July 1, 2019, in the second sentence, added “equipment” after “cases.”

§ 18-3-515.
Preparation and publication of annual statements.

Each board of county commissioners at their regular July meeting shall request a statement of the receipts and expenditures of the county during the preceding twelve (12) months setting forth the source and amount of all receipts and the purpose and the amount of all expenditures to be prepared upon reconciliation of all accounts by the county treasurer and county clerk, not later than September 30. The statement shall be signed by the chairman and clerk of the board and shall be posted on the county’s designated official website in the manner provided in W.S. 18-3-516(f) and published at least once in the county’s designated official newspaper.

History.

C.L. 1876, ch. 28, art. I, § 20; R.S. 1887, § 1811; R.S. 1899, § 1067; C.S. 1910, § 1175; C.S. 1920, § 1421; R.S. 1931, § 30-614; C.S. 1945, § 27-817; W.S. 1957, § 18-160; Laws 1977, ch. 124, § 1; 1985, ch. 34, § 1; 2010, ch. 34, § 1; 2014 ch. 85, § 1, effective July 1, 2014.

The 2010 amendment,

substituted “request a statement” for “have prepared a statement”; inserted “to be prepared upon reconciliation of all accounts by the county treasurer and county clerk, not later than September 30”; and substituted “of general circulation” for “printed.”

Laws 2010, ch. 34 § 3, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 4, 2010.

The 2014 amendment,

effective July 1, 2014, in the last sentence, inserted “posted on the county's designated official website in the manner provided in W.S. 18-3-516(f) and,” substituted “once in the county's designated official” for “two (2) times in a,” and deleted “of general circulation in the county, or if there is none, by posting the statement in three (3) public places in the county.”

§ 18-3-516.
Publication of proceedings; publication of salary information of certain officials and employees.

Each board of county commissioners shall post a comprehensive summary of the entire proceedings of all regular and special meetings held by the board on the county’s official website in the manner provided in subsection (f) of this section and publish the comprehensive summary of the entire proceedings of all regular and special meetings held by them one (1) time in the county’s designated official newspaper. The county clerk of each county shall within twelve (12) working days after adjournment of every meeting for which the next scheduled meeting will be called to order in two (2) weeks time or less, or within eighteen (18) working days after adjournment of every meeting for which the next scheduled meeting will be called to order in more than two (2) weeks time, furnish the paper with a copy of the proceedings. Except for salaries and wages published under subsection (b) of this section, the copy shall include any bill presented to the board stating the amount of the bill, the amount allowed, the purpose of the bill and the claimant. Claims for part-time employees may be summarized by department without listing each part-time employee. The newspaper shall publish the copy of proceedings within nine (9) days after receipt. The board shall post on its official website, and if practicable publish, notice of the time of all regular and special meetings.

Each board of county commissioners shall post on the county’s official website in the manner provided in subsection (f) of this section and publish separate from the minutes of the proceedings:

Within sixty (60) days after the end of each fiscal year, the name, position, base annual salary of and amount of overtime pay paid to each full-time employee and each elected official. A brief statement shall accompany the salary publication specifying that all salaries are listed as base annual salaries or actual wages, not including any benefits such as health insurance costs, life insurance benefits and pension plans. The statement shall also indicate that any overtime that the employee earned and was paid by the county is included.

Repealed by Laws 2014, ch. 85, § 2.

Repealed by Laws 2014, ch. 85, § 2.

Subsection (b) of this section shall not apply to undercover personnel working in the law enforcement field.

Any nonprofit corporation which receives at least twenty-five percent (25%) of its total annual budget from county funds, state funds or both in combination shall annually submit a list of all full-time positions employed by the corporation and the wages and salaries paid each position, without the name of the employee, to the commission, board, council or agency from which the funds are received.

For all publications required by statute to be posted on a county’s official website, the publication shall be posted at times required for publication in a designated official newspaper. Until June 30, 2016, each board of county commissioners shall cause to be published in the designated official newspaper once per month, no less than twelve (12) times per year, a general public notice pertaining to access to county information. After June 30, 2016, this general public notice shall be published at least once per year.

History.

Laws 1877, p. 92, § 1; R.S. 1887, § 1814; R.S. 1899, § 1070; C.S. 1910, § 1178; C.S. 1920, § 1424; R.S. 1931, § 30-617; C.S. 1945, § 27-821; W.S. 1957, § 18-161; Laws 1977, ch. 124, § 1; 1983, ch. 54, § 1; 1986, ch. 44, § 1; 2004, ch. 130, § 1; 2007, ch. 82, § 1; 2014 ch. 85, §§
1, 2, effective July 1, 2014; 2015 ch. 131, § 1, effective March 4, 2015; 2020 ch. 36, § 1, effective July 1, 2020.

The 2004 amendment,

in (b)(i), inserted “that” following “wages do not include any overtime.”

Laws 2004, ch. 130, § 4, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 19, 2004.

The 2007 amendment,

in (a), substituted “twelve (12) working days after adjournment of every meeting for which the next scheduled meeting will be called to order in two (2) weeks time or less, or within eighteen (18) working days after adjournment of every meeting for which the next scheduled meeting will be called to order in more than two (2) weeks time” for “twelve (12) days after adjournment of every meeting.”

Laws 2007, ch. 82, § 2, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by Article 4, § 8 of the Wyoming Constitution. Approved February 21, 2007.

The 2020 amendment,

effective July 1, 2020, in (b)(i) substituted “position, base annual salary of and amount of overtime pay paid to each” for “position and gross monthly salary of each,” “base annual salaries or actual wages” for “gross monthly salaries or actual monthly wages,” “benefits” for “fringe benefits,” “any overtime that the employee earned and was paid” for “the salaries or wages do not include any overtime that the employee may earn which would be paid,” and added “is included” at the end.

The 2014 amendments. —

The first 2014 amendment, by ch. 85, §§ 1, 2, effective July 1, 2014, in (a), rewrote the first sentence; inserted “port on its official website, and” following “board shall”; in the introductory paragraph of (b), inserted “post on the county's official website in the manner provided in subsection (f) of this section and” following “shall”; rewrote (b)(i); repealed former (b)(ii) which read: “During March of each year, a complete list of all chief administrative officials, assistant administrative officials, elected officials, department heads and full-time employees of the county specified by name and position, excluding salaries”; repealed former (c) which read: “As used in this section, 'department head' means any employee responsible for the operation of a major functional area of county government including any independently elected official”; and added (f).

The second 2014 amendment, by ch. 93, § 1, effective July 1, 2014, added (f).

This section is set out as reconciled by the Wyoming legislative service office.

The 2015 amendment,

in (b)(i), deleted “and” at the end, and made a related change.

Laws 2015, ch. 131, § 3, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 4, 2015.

Conflicting legislation. —

Laws 2004, ch. 130, § 3, provides: “Any other act adopted by the Wyoming legislature during the same session in which this act is adopted shall be given precedence and shall prevail over the amendments in this act to the extent that such acts are in conflict with this act.”

In general. —

All proceedings of the board must be published immediately. North Laramie Land Co. v. Hoffman, 30 Wyo. 238, 30 Wyo. 239, 219 P. 561,

1923 Wyo. LEXIS 43

(Wyo. 1923), aff'd, 268 U.S. 276, 45 S. Ct. 491, 69 L. Ed. 953, 1925 U.S. LEXIS 568 (U.S. 1925).

Stated

in

State ex rel. State Hwy. Comm'n v. Meeker, 75 Wyo. 210, 294 P.2d 603,

1956 Wyo. LEXIS 10

(1956).

§ 18-3-517.
Designation of official paper.

When there is more than one (1) paper published in any county the board of county commissioners shall designate which one is the official paper of the county.

History.

Laws 1877, p. 93, § 6; R.S. 1887, § 1817; R.S. 1899, § 1071; C.S. 1910, § 1179; C.S. 1920, § 1425; R.S. 1931, § 30-618; C.S. 1945, § 27-822; W.S. 1957, § 18-162; Laws 1977, ch. 124, § 1.

In general. —

It is the duty of the board of commissioners to designate an official paper of the county, where there is more than 1 paper published in the county. Appel v. State, 9 Wyo. 187, 61 P. 1015,

1900 Wyo. LEXIS 13

(Wyo. 1900).

Designation by commissioners. —

It is duty of board of county commissioners to designate official paper where more than 1 paper is published within county. Appel v. State, 9 Wyo. 187, 61 P. 1015,

1900 Wyo. LEXIS 13

(Wyo. 1900).

Treasurer's discretion. —

The county treasurer may publish notice of sale of real property for delinquent taxes in any paper he may select, and the county is liable for the publication, as he is not bound to use the official paper. Albany County v. Chaplin, 5 Wyo. 74, 37 P. 370,

1894 Wyo. LEXIS 20

(Wyo. 1894).

Notice of tax sales. —

County treasurer may publish notice of sale of realty for delinquent taxes in any paper he may select which need not be the official paper, and county is liable for the publication. Albany County v. Chaplin, 5 Wyo. 74, 37 P. 370,

1894 Wyo. LEXIS 20

(Wyo. 1894).

§ 18-3-518.
Legal advertising; rates; type size requirements; “daily newspaper”; “weekly newspaper.”

Legal advertising required by law to be published shall be purchased at a rate not to exceed the amount charged by a daily newspaper at the lowest rate for display advertising or by a weekly newspaper at the open local display advertising rate. Weekly newspapers shall grant customary discounts or contractual rates to any local government fulfilling the requirements necessary to qualify for the discount or rate. Legal advertising shall be in the same type size used by that publisher in regular classified advertising columns, provided that such type size shall be no larger than nine (9) point type, with spacing between lines not to exceed one-half (1/2) point leading.

As used in this section, “daily newspaper” means a newspaper published regularly at least five (5) times each week and “weekly newspaper” means a newspaper published regularly not more than five (5) times each week and at least once a week.

History.

Laws 1897, ch. 73, § 1; R.S. 1899, § 1080; C.S. 1910, § 1075; Laws 1919, ch. 9, § 1; C.S. 1920, § 1308; R.S. 1931, § 29-309; C.S. 1945, § 27-823; Laws 1949, ch. 73, § 1; 1957, ch. 59, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 18-163; Laws 1971, ch. 84, § 1; 1977, ch. 91, § 1; ch. 124, § 1; 1983, ch. 54, § 1.

Cross references. —

As to public printing and supplies, with reference to the state generally, see §

16-6-301

.

Editor's notes. —

Section

18-3-518

, which was enacted by § 1, ch. 124, Laws 1977, has been deleted and § 18-163, W.S. 1957, which was amended by § 1, ch. 91, Laws 1977, by rewriting the first sentence and adding the second sentence, now appears as §

18-3-518

.

Constitutionality. —

The amendatory act in connection with the original act did not violate art. 1, §§ 20, 30, 31, 34, 35 and art. 3, §§ 24, 27, 31, Wyo. Const.In re Gillette Daily Journal, 44 Wyo. 226, 11 P.2d 265,

1932 Wyo. LEXIS 20

(Wyo. 1932).

Title of act. —

The title of this act amending §

18-3-519

“An act to amend and reenact § 1310, Wyoming Compiled Statutes, 1920, relating to and defining legal newspapers” was not in violation of art. 3, § 24, Wyo. Const.In re Gillette Daily Journal, 44 Wyo. 226, 11 P.2d 265,

1932 Wyo. LEXIS 20

(Wyo. 1932).

Cited

in

Board of County Comm'rs v. Chaplin, 5 Wyo. 74, 37 P. 370,

1894 Wyo. LEXIS 20

(1894); Pirie v. Kamps, 68 Wyo. 83, 229 P.2d 927,

1951 Wyo. LEXIS 18

, 26 A.L.R.2d 647 (1951).

§ 18-3-519.
Requirements as to newspaper publishing legal notices.

The publication of any legal notice, printing or advertising required by law is without force or effect unless published in a newspaper which has been regularly issued at least once each week for a period of fifty-two (52) consecutive weeks prior to the date of the first publication of the notice or advertisement, has a paid circulation of at least five hundred (500) and each page is not less than ten (10) inches by twelve and one-half (12.5) inches in size.

The provisions of this section shall not apply in counties where no newspaper has been regularly issued for fifty-two (52) consecutive weeks, where there is only one (1) newspaper in the county, or in any county where no newspaper meets the requirements of this section.

History.

Laws 1897, ch. 73, § 4 [3]; R.S. 1899, § 1082; C.S. 1910, § 1077; C.S. 1920, § 1310; Laws 1931, ch. 85, § 1; R.S. 1931, § 29-311; C.S. 1945, § 27-825; Laws 1951, ch. 84, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 18-165; Laws 1977, ch. 124, § 1; 2005, ch. 116, § 1.

Cross references. —

As to publication of notice generally, see §§

1-6-201

to

1-6-204

.

The 2005 amendment,

in (a), substituted “twelve and one-half (12.5) inches” for “fourteen (14) inches,” and made a stylistic change.

Laws 2005, ch. 116, § 2, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved February 24, 2005.

Constitutionality. —

The amendatory act in connection with the original act did not violate art. 1, §§ 20, 30, 31, 34, 35 and art. 3, §§ 24, 27, 31, Wyo. Const.In re Gillette Daily Journal, 44 Wyo. 226, 11 P.2d 265,

1932 Wyo. LEXIS 20

(Wyo. 1932).

Constitutionality of section. —

This section is a special law giving special privileges in contravention of art. 3, § 27, Wyo. Const. It confers particular privileges upon certain merchants and publishers, and imposes peculiar disabilities and burdensome conditions on other merchants and publishers, all of whom stand in the same relation to the law. It was not within the power of the legislature to evade the operation of the constitutional provisions by creating an arbitrary and unnatural distinction between persons thus related to the law. Pirie v. Kamps, 68 Wyo. 83, 229 P.2d 927,

1951 Wyo. LEXIS 18

(Wyo. 1951).

Where a newspaper meets the requirements of this section it cannot raise the constitutionality of the 1931 amendment. In re Gillette Daily Journal, 45 Wyo. 173, 17 P.2d 665,

1933 Wyo. LEXIS 4

(Wyo. 1933).

This section does not deprive anyone of his life or his property under art. 1, § 6, Wyo. Const.Pirie v. Kamps, 68 Wyo. 83, 229 P.2d 927,

1951 Wyo. LEXIS 18

(1951). See also In re Gillette Daily Journal, 44 Wyo. 226, 11 P.2d 265,

1932 Wyo. LEXIS 20

(Wyo. 1932).

Interveners cannot claim unconstitutionality of act. —

In an action by a newspaper to have it declared a legal newspaper to which other newspapers intervened, the interveners cannot claim the unconstitutionality of the act on appeal. In re Gillette Daily Journal, 45 Wyo. 173, 17 P.2d 665,

1933 Wyo. LEXIS 4

(Wyo. 1933).

Title of act. —

Title of this act amending this section, “An act to amend and reenact § 1310, Wyoming Compiled Statutes, 1920, relating to and defining legal newspapers,” was not in violation of art. 3, § 24, Wyo. Const.In re Gillette Daily Journal, 44 Wyo. 226, 11 P.2d 265,

1932 Wyo. LEXIS 20

(Wyo. 1932).

Ordinary newspaper not privileged over tabloid. —

The aim of a statute relating to legal publications is, or should be, to have these publications made in a newspaper which is of general circulation in the community, so as to be generally read and so that the contents of the notice may be brought home to the public generally. No reason exists to give the publisher of an ordinary and standard newspaper a special privilege over that granted to the publisher of a tabloid newspaper if legal notices inserted in the newspaper of the latter subserve that general aim and the tabloid newspaper is regularly published for the length of time required by this section and has the required circulation. Pirie v. Kamps, 68 Wyo. 83, 229 P.2d 927,

1951 Wyo. LEXIS 18

(Wyo. 1951).

Giving a strict and the ordinary construction to the term “page,” as used in this section, a tabloid newspaper would not be a legal newspaper

within the meaning of this section, although that might not be true if it is liberally construed. Pirie v. Kamps, 68 Wyo. 83, 229 P.2d 927,

1951 Wyo. LEXIS 18

(Wyo. 1951).

But whether a newspaper is one of general circulation is a matter of substance and not of size.

Pirie v. Kamps, 68 Wyo. 83, 229 P.2d 927,

1951 Wyo. LEXIS 18

(Wyo. 1951).

This section prescribes under what circumstances a published notice shall have the effect of a legal notice.

The legislature has undoubtedly the right, in exercising the sovereign or police power of the state, to make reasonable regulations in regard to legal notices. The publication thereof is not a right, but at most a privilege, which the legislature bestows, and which it can modify or take away. In re Gillette Daily Journal, 44 Wyo. 226, 11 P.2d 265,

1932 Wyo. LEXIS 20

(Wyo. 1932); Pirie v. Kamps, 68 Wyo. 83, 229 P.2d 927,

1951 Wyo. LEXIS 18

(Wyo. 1951).

This section does not prohibit the entering into a contract between the owner of a tabloid newspaper and the plaintiff or anyone else.

Whether or not a publication made pursuant to such contract shall have the effect of a legal notice is a collateral matter. Still, to say that the right to have a notice published in a certain paper, and have it recognized as a legal notice, is part of the liberty of the people under art. 1, § 6, Wyo. Const., possibly stretches the term “liberty” too far. Pirie v. Kamps, 68 Wyo. 83, 229 P.2d 927,

1951 Wyo. LEXIS 18

(Wyo. 1951).

Cited

in

Board of County Comm'rs v. Chaplin, 5 Wyo. 74, 37 P. 370,

1894 Wyo. LEXIS 20

(1894); State v. Pitet, 69 Wyo. 478, 243 P.2d 177,

1952 Wyo. LEXIS 14

(1952).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Application of requirement that newspaper be locally published for official notice publication, 85 ALR4th 581.

§ 18-3-520.
Restrictions upon employment of attorneys.

No attorney shall be employed by the board of county commissioners except as provided by W.S.

18-2-110

and the nature and necessity of such employment shall appear in the record of the board.

History.

Laws 1879, ch. 8, § 2; R.S. 1887, § 1797; R.S. 1899, § 1079; C.S. 1910, § 1073; C.S. 1920, § 1306; R.S. 1931, § 29-307; C.S. 1945, § 27-826; W.S. 1957, § 18-166; Laws 1977, ch. 124, § 1; 2004, ch. 130, § 1.

Cross references. —

For additional provision relating to employment of attorneys, see §

18-3-302

.

The 2004 amendment

substituted “W.S.

18-2-110

” for “W.S.

18-2-107

.”

Laws 2004, ch. 130, § 4, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 19, 2004.

Conflicting legislation. —

Laws 2004, ch. 130, § 3, provides: “Any other act adopted by the Wyoming legislature during the same session in which this act is adopted shall be given precedence and shall prevail over the amendments in this act to the extent that such acts are in conflict with this act.”

Cited

in

Appel v. State ex rel. Shutter-Cottrell, 9 Wyo. 187, 61 P. 1015,

1900 Wyo. LEXIS 13

(1900).

§ 18-3-521.
Appropriation to encourage industrial development; advertising county resources.

Each board of county commissioners may make appropriations from the county general fund for advertising the resources of the county, for furthering its industrial development or for encouraging exhibits at fairs, expositions and conventions. The appropriation shall not be for the express aid of any private citizen, firm or corporation.

History.

Laws 1909, ch. 153, § 1; C.S. 1910, § 1336; C.S. 1920, § 1585; R.S. 1931, § 3-101; C.S. 1945, § 27-827; W.S. 1957, § 18-167; Laws 1977, ch. 124, § 1; 1979, ch. 86, § 1.

Cross references. —

As to the Wyoming Business Council, see §

9-12-101

et seq.

As to power of governing body of city or town to appropriate funds for advertisement of resources, see §

15-1-111

.

As to powers of municipalities and counties in relation to industrial development projects, see §

15-1-701

.

Repealing clauses. —

Section 3, ch. 153, Laws 1909, repealed all laws and parts of laws in conflict therewith.

§ 18-3-522.
Membership in organizations for furtherance of good government.

Each board of county commissioners may take out a county membership and cooperate with associations and organizations of other counties or county officials within or without this state for the furtherance of good government and the protection of county interests. The cost of membership may be paid with county funds.

History.

Laws 1945, ch. 136, § 1; C.S. 1945, § 27-828; W.S. 1957, § 18-168; Laws 1977, ch. 124, § 1.

§ 18-3-523.
Removal from office.

If any county commissioner refuses or neglects without just cause to perform any duties required of him as a member of the board of county commissioners or knowingly commits any act which by law is in violation of his official oath and bond, charges in writing may be made against him before the district judge of the district in which the county is situated. Notice of filing and a copy of the charges shall be served upon the accused by the sheriff of the county within ten (10) days after the charges are filed with the clerk of the district court. The cause shall be tried not later than thirty (30) days from the filing of the charges and shall be by the court without the intervention of a jury. After submission of the proof the commissioner shall be removed from office by the governor of the state.

If charges against a county commissioner are filed with the governor, he shall cause the accused commissioner to be served with a copy of the charges and notice of the time the governor will hear the matter. The hearing before the governor shall be not less than twenty (20) days after the date of the notice.

History.

C.L. 1876, ch. 28, art. I, § 21; R.S. 1887, § 1812; R.S. 1899, § 1068; C.S. 1910, § 1176; Laws 1913, ch. 67, § 1; C.S. 1920, § 1422; R.S. 1931, § 30-615; C.S. 1945, § 27-818; W.S. 1957, § 18-169; Laws 1977, ch. 124, § 1.

Cross references. —

As to removal from office generally, see §§

18-3-901

to

18-3-907

.